zh-TW: 木槌材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 銅色; 紅銅色; 人造皮; 毛氈; 玻璃纖維; 石墨; 鐵; 皮製; 氯丁橡膠; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡膠; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 木材; 毛線; 其他
ru: Материал молотка: Алюминий; Латунь; Бронза; Медь; Искусственная кожа; Фетр; Стекловолокно; Графит; Железо; Кожа; Неопрен; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиуретан (ПУ); Резина; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Дерево; Пряжа; Другое
da: Køllemateriale: Aluminum; Messing; Bronze; Kobber; Kunstigt læder; Filt; Glasfiber; Grafit; Jern; Læder; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Træ; Garn; Andet
tr: Tokmak malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Bronz; Bakır; Suni deri; Keçe; Fiberglas; Grafit; Demir; Deri; Neopren; Plastik; Plastik; Poliüretan (PU); Kauçuk; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Ahşap; Yün İplikleri; Diğer
el: Υλικό κόπανου: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Ορείχαλκος; Χαλκός; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Τσόχα; Υαλοβάμβακας; Γραφίτης; Σίδερο; Δέρμα; Νεοπρένιο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Καουτσούκ; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Ξύλο; Νήμα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 木槌材质: 铝; 黄铜; 青铜色; 铜色; 人造皮革; 毛毡; 玻璃纤维; 石墨; 铁; 皮革; 氯丁橡胶; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡胶; 不锈钢; 钢; 木头; 纱线; 其他
sl-SI: Material za palice za bobne: Aluminij; Medenina; Bron; Baker; Umetno usnje; Filc; Steklena vlakna; Grafit; Železo; Usnje; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Les; Preja; Drugo
pl: Materiał kija typu mallet: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Brąz; Miedź; Skaj; Filc; Włókno szklane; Grafit; Żelazo; Skórzane; Neopren; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Drewno; Przędza; Inne
pt-BR: Material do martelo: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Cobre; Couro falso; Sentido; Fibra de vidro; Grafite; Ferro; Couro; Neoprene; Nylon; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Madeira; Fio; Outro
vi: Vật liệu búa gỗ: Nhôm; Đồng; Màu đồng; Màu đồng đỏ; Da giả; Nỉ; Sợi thủy tinh; Than chì; Sắt; Da; Neoprene; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyurethane (PU); Cao su; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Gỗ; Chỉ; Khác
sk-SK: Materiál paličky: Hliník; Mosadz; Bronzový; Meď; Umelá koža; Plsť; Sklolaminát; Grafit; Železo; Koža; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretán (PU); Guma; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Drevo; Priadza; Iné
lt-LT: Lazdelių medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Bronza; Varis; Dirbtinė oda; Veltinis; Stiklo pluoštas; Grafitas; „Iron“ (tiesių smūgių); Oda; Neoprenas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliuretanas (PU); Kaučiukas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Mediena; Verpalai; Kita
cs: Materiál paličky: Hliník; Mosaz; Bronzová; Měděná; Nepravá kůže; Plst; Skelná vata; Grafit; Železo; Kůže; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Guma; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Dřevo; Příze; Jiné
de: Schlägelmaterial: Aluminium; Messing; Bronze; Kupfer; Kunstleder; Filz; Fiberglas; Graphit; Eisen; Leder; Neopren; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Edelstahl; Stahl; Holz; Garn; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Materialul ciocănelelor de percuție: Aluminiu; Alamă; Bronz; Cupru; Imitație de piele; Pâslă; Fibră de sticlă; Grafit; Fier; Piele; Neopren; Nailon; Plastic; Poliuretan (PU); Cauciuc; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Lemn; Fir; Altele
es: Material del mazo: Aluminio; Latón; Bronce; Cobre; Cuero sintético; Fieltro; Fibra de vidrio; Grafito; Hierro; Cuero; Neopreno; Nylon; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Goma; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Madera; Hilo; Otros
ko: 말렛 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 청동색; 구리; 인조 가죽; 펠트; 유리 섬유; 흑연; 철; 가죽; 네오프렌; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리우레탄(PU); 고무; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 목재; 털실; 기타
nl: Materiaal houten hamer: Aluminium; Messing; Brons; Koper; Kunstleer; Vilt; Glasvezel; Grafiet; IJzer; Leer; Neopreen; Nylon; Plastic; Polyurethaan (PU); Rubber; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Hout; Garen; Andere
it: Materiale del martello: Alluminio; Ottone; Bronzo; Rame; Ecopelle; Feltro; Vetroresina; Grafite; Ferro; Pelle; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastica; Poliuretano (PU); Gomma; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Legno; Filato; Altro
fr: Matériau du maillet: Aluminum; Laiton; Bronze; Cuivre; Faux cuir; Feutre; Fibre de verre; Graphite; Fer; Cuir; Néoprène; Nylon; Plastique; Polyuréthane (PU); Caoutchouc; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Bois; Yarn; Autre
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำมัลเลท: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; สีบรอนซ์; สีทองแดง; หนังเทียม; ผ้าสักหลาด; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; แกรไฟท์; เหล็ก; หนัง; นีโอพรีน; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); ยาง; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; ไม้; ด้าย; อื่นๆ
sv: Klubba - material: Aluminium; Mässing; Brons; Koppar; Fuskläder; Filt; Glasfiber; Grafit; Järn; Läder; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Trä; Garn; Övrigt
hr-HR: Materijal batića: Aluminij; Mjed; Bronca; Bakar; Umjetna koža; Filc; Stakloplastika; Grafit; Željezo; Koža; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Drvo; Pređa; Ostalo
ja: マレット材質: アルミニウム; 真鍮; ブロンズ; コッパー; フェイクレザー; フェルト; ガラス繊維; グラファイト; 鉄; レザー; ネオプレン; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリウレタン (PU); ゴム; ステンレススチール; スチール; 木材; 毛糸; その他
fi: Malletin materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Pronssi; Kupari; Keinonahka; Huopa; Lasikuitu; Grafiitti; Rauta; Nahka; Neopreeni; Nailon; Muovi; Polyuretaani (PU); Kumi; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Puu; Lanka; Muu
en: Mallet material: Aluminum; Brass; Bronze; Copper; Faux leather; Felt; Fiberglass; Graphite; Iron; Leather; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastic; Polyurethane (PU); Rubber; Stainless steel; Steel; Wood; Yarn; Other
pt-PT: Material do macete: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Cobre; Couro falso; Feltro; Fibra de vidro; Grafite; Ferro; Pele; Neoprene; Náilon; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Madeira; Fio; Outro
hu: Ütő anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Bronz; Réz; Műbőr; Filc; Üveggyapot; Grafit; Vas; Bőr; Neoprén; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliuretán (PU); Gumi; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Fa; Fonal; Egyéb
nb: Hammermateriale: Aluminium; Messing; Bronse; Kobber; Kunstig lær; Filt; Glassfiber; Grafitt; Jern; Skinn; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Trevirke; Garn; Annet
bg-BG: Материал на чука: Алуминий; Месинг; Бронз; Мед; Изкуствена кожа; Филц; Fiberglass; Графит; Желязо; Кожа; Неопрен; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиуретан (PU); Каучук; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Дърво; Прежда; Други